Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
PROPERTY CONTRACTS, DEBTS, AND LIABILITIES

Note

Part heading added by L 1984, c 79, §1.

Cross References

Community property, see chapter 510.

[§572-21] Presumption of separate property.
There is a rebuttable presumption that all property, both real and personal,
acquired in the name of the husband or of the wife, without regard to the time
of acquisition thereof, is the separate property of the spouse in the name of
whom the same has been acquired. [L 1945, c 273, pt of §1; am L 1949, c 242,
§3(a); RL 1955, §326-1; HRS §510-1; ren L 1984, c 79, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next